xfst/phonology.xfst
! There are flags at morpheme boundaries.
set flag-is-epsilon ON 

! Defining natural classes and morphological boundaries

! All consonants, including special characters
define Cons [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | n1 | p | s | s1 | t | v | w | w1 | w2 | x | y | y1 | z | "'" ] ;

! implictly includes long vowels, which just repeats characters
define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | i1 | i2 | V1 ] ;

! nonlight vowels are simply long vowels
define NonLight [[Vowel ?* Vowel] | e ] ?* ;

! Define stem boundary markers
define PREBD "<<"+ ;
define SUFBD ">>"+ ;
define BD ["<<" | ">>"]+ ;

! Sometimes there may be more than one consecutive
! morpheme boundary. Reduce those to 1.
define PrefixBoundaryCleanup PREBD @-> "<<" ;
define SuffixBoundaryCleanup SUFBD @-> ">>" ;


! Begin suffix rules

! Begin verb suffix rules

! d-deletion: Delete stem-final "d" 
! 	when the suffix complex starts with a consonant.
define dDeletion d -> 0 || _ SUFBD Cons ;

! iInsertion: insert "i" in derived reciprocal/reflexive stems 
! that end in a glottal stop, n, w (because of wiijiiw), or s (because of gikas)
define iInsertion [..] -> i || [{'}|{n}|{w}|{s}] _ SUFBD {di} ;

! dPalatalizationGe: "d" stems get palatalized to "j" with detransitive suffix /-ge/ 
! e.g. agood- (vti2 agoodoon) + -ge -> agoojige
define dPalatalizationGe d -> j || _ SUFBD {ge} ;

! tPalatalizationGe: "t" stems get palatalized to "ch" with detransitive suffix /-ge/ 
! e.g. at- (vti2 atoon) + -ge -> achige
define tPalatalizationGe t -> {ch} || _ SUFBD {ge} ;

! iInsertionGe: insert "i" in all detransitivized stems ending in a consonant, 
! excluding "m", because here we want nasal assimilation (as seen in "agazonge").
! i-insertion is done here to avoid overlapping with a different  "-ige" suffix, 
! like the one present in "aanjige", with "-ige" meaning s/he acts in relation to a dwelling (OPD).
define iInsertionGe [..] -> i || [{s}|{z}|{'}|{k}|{n}|{j}|{zh}|{ch}] _ SUFBD {ge} ;

! nasalAssimilation: With stems ending in "m", the "m" 
! 	changes to "n" when the suffix complex starts with "z", "g", or "d".
define nasalAssimilation m -> n || Vowel _ SUFBD [z|g|d] ;

! iBeforeAmawDeletion: Delete the stem final "i" that follows "d" 
! when the suffix is the benefactive marker "amaw".
! Currently only seen in the vti3 case naadi- (naadin) + -amaw -> naadamaw 
define iBeforeAmawDeletion i -> 0 || d _ SUFBD {amaw} ;

! awaaRule: For stems that end in "aw", the "aw" goes to "aa" 
! 	when the suffix complex starts with "g", "k", or "d".
define awaaRule w -> a || a _ SUFBD [k|g|d] ;

! awooRule: For stems that end in "aw", the "aw" goes to "oo" 
!	when the suffix complex starts with "n" or "s".
define awooRule a w -> o o || _ SUFBD [n|s] ;

! awowRule: The amaw of benefactive verbs is replaced by amow 
! in direct forms by some speakers at Red Lake and elsewhere.
define awowRule a w (->) o w || a m _ SUFBD [ a a | a g ] ;

! woRule1, woRule2: "wi(1)" becomes "o" after a consonant (either everywhere or word finally). 
! 	In Border Lakes, this rule only applies with non-word-final "Cwi" sequences where C is anything other than the glottal stop.
! 		For example, we get "mizhwi" rather than "mizho" for the imerative form
!		and "nindoodita'wig" rather than "nindoodita'og" with the proximate acting on 1sg inverse.
define woRule1 [ w1 -> o1 || [ Cons - '] _ SUFBD [i|i1] (SUFBD) [? - [(SUFBD)|w1] ] ] .o. [[i|i1] -> 0 || o1 SUFBD _ ] .o. [o1 -> o];
define woRule2 [ w1 (->) o1 || ' _ SUFBD [i|i1] (SUFBD) [? - [(SUFBD)|w1] ] ] .o. [[i|i1] -> 0 || o1 SUFBD _ ] .o. [o1 -> o];
define woRule3 [ w1 (->) o1 || Cons _ SUFBD [i|i1] (SUFBD) .#. ] .o. [[i|i1] -> 0 || o1 SUFBD _ ] .o. [o1 -> o];

! izhiInverseDel: Stem for izhi "in1" deletes just in case the theme sign is inverse (igo or igoo)
! Accounts for sub-regular behavior of izhi "say/speak to h/"
! Ensures that the inverse is treated like the stem for the purposes of prefix rules by deleting suffix boundary.
define izhiInverseDel i n1 SUFBD -> 0 || PREBD _ i g ;

! izhiShortVPreservation: Insert a w2 at the end of the word when irregular stem izhi "in1" is presnt just in case it only ends in "i1"
! This prevents the short vowel from getting deleted when a preverb is added.
define izhiShortVPreservation [..] -> w2 || PREBD (m a j i "-") i z h SUFBD i1 _ ;

! glottaloMetathesis: -ii'o becomes -iiw' at the end of a word.
! VAI stems with ending in -ii'o show a variant where rather than deleting the short o word-finally, it gets turned to a w and metathesized to iiw'
! Probably a rule specific to GJ or Lac La Croix more generally.
define glottaloMetathesis ' o (->) w ' || i i _ SUFBD ;

! wMetathesis: zha'w becomes zhwa' at the end of a word.
! For ES in the OPD, biindigenizha' and babaaminizha' have variants biindigenizhwa' and babaaminizhwa'
! Not clear how general this rule is to a dialect versus a specific speaker.
define wMetathesis a ' w1 (->) w a ' || z h _ SUFBD ;

! ywRule: Change y to w after o in certain contexts
! This captures a variant of the conjunct order -yaan, -yaang, -yan, and -yang where the y is a w.
! In the OPD set, this is specific to Border Lakes (and specifically NJ)
define ywRule y (->) w || [ o SUFBD | {igoo} | SUFBD o o ] _ a (a) n ;

! angongRule: change the first person exclusive -ang to -ong after am
define angongRule a (->) o || a (SUFBD) m _ n g ;

! shared noun and verb suffix rules

! n1Rule, s1Rule: Stems ending in "n1" palatalize to "zh" and "s1" to "sh" 
! when the suffix complex starts with the first person theme sign "i1" 
! or inanimate singular marker "i2".
define n1Rule n1 -> {zh} || _ SUFBD [i1|i2] ;
define s1Rule s1 -> {sh} || _ SUFBD [i1|i2] ;

! Deals with certain n1 stems that end in nn1 (e.g. wiinzh), where one n deletes so there is not two n's in a row
define nDeletion n -> 0 || _ n1 SUFBD ;

! vowelDeletion: Delete word-final short vowels in multi-syllabic words 
! or mono-syllabic words with a long vowel 
! (preseve the short vowel in mono-syllabic words with a short vowel, e.g. "makwa").
define vowelDeletion [ Vowel - e ] -> 0 || NonLight Cons (SUFBD) _ (SUFBD) .#. ;

! w1Deletion: Delete word-final w1
define w1Deletion w1 -> 0 || _ (SUFBD) .#. ;

! LengthenV: a short vowel to the left of v1 lengthens 
! (so i -> ii / _ v1, a -> aa / _ v1, o -> oo / _ v1)
define LengthenV [ i -> {ii} , a -> {aa} , o -> {oo} || _ SUFBD V1 ] .o. [ V1 -> 0 ] ;

! noun-specific suffix rules

! w2Deletion: w2 deletes word finally, before consonants, before vowels "o", 
! before "oo", and before "V1" (so remains before vowels a, aa, i, ii, and e)
define w2Deletion w2 -> 0 || _ (BD) [o | V1 | Cons | "-" | .#. ] ; 

! y(1)hRule: Turn y(1) into h if it follows a long vowel + n sequence at the end of a word 
! This handles some stems that are encoded inconsistently; 
! a purely orthographic rule.
define y1hRule y1 -> h || [Vowel Vowel | e] n (SUFBD) _ (SUFBD) .#. ;
define yhRule y -> h || [Vowel Vowel | e] n _ SUFBD .#. ;

! y1Deletion: Delete y1 at the end of a word
define y1Deletion y1 -> 0 || _ (SUFBD) .#. ;

! hDeletion: Optionally delete h between n and y (h -> 0 / n_y). 
! Optional, only because sometimes the spelling convention of 
! deleting that "h" is done inconsistently.
define hDeletion h (->) 0 || n _ y1 ;

! y2Deletion: Always delete y2
define y2Deletion y2 -> 0 ;

! irrDiman: Irregular diminutive form nouns ending in "an". 
! Optionally appears as -aans rather than -anens
define irrDiman a n SUFBD e n (->) a a n ">>" || [? - a] _ ;

! irrDimVVny: Irregular diminutive form in VVny stems. 
! For example, "-oon(h)yens" becomes "-oon(h)s" 
define irrDimVVny n y1 SUFBD e n (->) n ">>" || [Vowel Vowel | e] _ ;

! irrDimAnimosh: Irregular diminutive form for the noun animosh.
define irrDimAnimosh e n -> o o n || a n i m o s h SUFBD _ ;

! irrOgiin: The NAD stem for "mother" has an irregular form of "ogiin" instead of "ogawan" in the third person
define irrOgiin w (PREBD) g a w2 (SUFBD) a n -> o "<<" g i i ">>" n ;

! ayDeletion: Delete the stem-final "ay" when the followed by "aa" or "e" and before "kw" or "gw"
! For example, the NID stem =nagway- has the form ninagwens for the diminutive and ninagwaang for the locative (with 1sg possessor)
define ayDeletion a y -> 0 || [ g | k ] w _ SUFBD [ a a | e ] ;

! ningwDeletion: Delete stem-final w with the stem ningwy.
! Captures the case of ningwy, where both the glides get deleted when at the end of the word, but the "y" blocks "w" deletion.
define ningwDeletion w -> 0 || n i n g _ SUFBD .#. ;

! iwiiRule: iw turns to ii (and the following vowel deletes) after certain consonants
! Captures a less-than-regular form of certain nouns, like gidagaa-bizhiins, nibizhiim, wajiing
define iwiiRule i [ w | w2 ] (SUFBD) [ i | e ] (->) i i ">>" || [ z h | n | d | j ] _ ;

! pejorativePalatalization: s and z palatalize to zh (or sh) when followed by the pejorative marker -ish.
! First rule is the most common case
! Second rule captures the occasional case where with s we get sh
! Third rule captures the "long-distance" case, where further away things palatalize
define pejorativePalatalization1 [ s | z | s h ] (->) z h || _ SUFBD i s h ;
define pejorativePalatalization2 s (->) s h || _ SUFBD i s h ;
define pejorativePalatalization3 z (->) z h || _ \h [ Cons | Vowel ]* SUFBD i s h ;

! Default rule
define defaultRules [ a1 -> a , i2 -> i , n1 -> n , s1 -> s , i1 -> i , w1 -> w , w2 -> w , y1 -> y ] ;

! Begin prefix rules

!Border Lakes prefix rules:

!ni(m/n/nd)-
!ni- before m, n, w, p, t, k, s, sh
!nim- before b
!nin- before d, j, z, zh, g
!nind- before vowels

!gi(d)-
!gi- before consonants
!gid- before vowels

!o(d)-
!o- before consonants
!od- before vowels

!ni-/n- before m, n, w, p, t, k, s, sh
!nim-/im-/m-/ni- before b
!nin-/in-/n-/ni- before d, j, z, zh, g
!nind-/ind-/nd-/nid-/nin-/in- before vowels
!At Red Lake, we get oy- and niy- before aa

define PrefixDInsertion [..] -> d || .#. (PREBD) [{gi}|o|{ni}] _ PREBD Vowel ;
define PrefixNDInsertion [..] (->) n || .#. (PREBD) {ni} _ d PREBD Vowel ;
define PrefixDDeletion d (->) 0 || .#. (PREBD) {nin} _ PREBD ;
define PrefixIND {nid} (->) [{ind} | {nd}] || .#. (PREBD) _ PREBD;
define PrefixMInsertion [..] (->) m || .#. (PREBD) {ni} _ PREBD b ;
define PrefixMOnly {ni} (->) 0 || .#. (PREBD) _ m PREBD b ;
define PrefixYInsertion [..] (->) y || .#. (PREBD) [{gi}|o|{ni}] _ PREBD {aa} ;
define PrefixNInsertion [..] (->) n || .#. (PREBD) {ni} _ PREBD [d|j|z|{zh}|g] ;
define PrefixNOnly {nin} (->) n || .#. _ PREBD [d|j|z|{zh}|g] ;
define PrefixNInitialDeletion n (->) 0 || .#. (PREBD) _ [ {ind} | {in} | {im} ] PREBD ;

define prefixOLengthening o -> {oo} || .#. (PREBD) [ [ [ n | g ] i | o | {nin} | {in} | n ] d ] PREBD _ \o ; 

! Dependent noun prefix rules
define DepPrefixiInsertionDi [..] -> i || .#. (PREBD) [{g}|{n}] _ PREBD Cons ;
define DepPrefixOInsertion [..] (->) o || .#. (PREBD) _ w PREBD i i ;
define DepPrefixWtoOOptional w (->) o || .#. (PREBD) _ PREBD w ;
define DepPrefixWDeletion w -> 0 || .#. (PREBD) _ PREBD [{o}|{w}] ;
define DepPrefixWtoO w -> o || .#. (PREBD) _ PREBD Cons ;

! gadaRule
define gadaRule g a "-" -> d a "-" || .#. (PREBD) _ ;

! There is something strange here! These excpetions do "regular" initial change, but involve the expected "dazhi" initial
! This rule just makes sure that these exceptions to the exceptions get the right version of IC.
! The stems are: dazhiikodaadiwag, dazhinge, dazhindi, dazhindizo, dazhinjigaade
define ChCnjExceptions "<ChCnj>" (PREBD) {da} -> "<<" {de} || _ [ z h i i k o | z h i n g e SUFBD | z h i n d i SUFBD | z h i n d i z o SUFBD | z h i n j i g a a d e SUFBD | s o o z | s o o n i d i | s o o z h SUFBD | s o o n1 SUFBD ] ;
